Utah statutes.
76-5-503.   Voluntary testing -- Victim to request -- Costs paid by Utah Office for Victims of Crime.

(1)  A victim or minor victim of a sexual offense as provided under Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, may request a test for the HIV infection.

(2) (a)  The local health department shall obtain the blood specimen from the victim and forward the specimen to the Department of Health.

(b)  The Department of Health shall analyze the specimen of the victim.

(3)  The testing shall consist of a base-line test of the victim at the time immediately or as soon as possible after the alleged occurrence of the sexual offense.  If the base-line test result is not positive, follow-up testing shall occur at three months and six months after the alleged occurrence of the sexual offense.

(4)  The Crime Victim Reparations Fund shall pay for the costs of the victim testing if the victim provides a substantiated claim of the sexual offense, does not test HIV positive at the base-line testing phase, and complies with eligibility criteria established by the Utah Office for Victims of Crime.



Amended by Chapter 131, 2011 General Session

